Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Article 3. Enforcement of Requirements for Tobacco Product Manufacturers.
§ 3.2-4212.
Penalties and other remedies.

In addition to any other civil or criminal penalty or remedy provided by law, upon a determination that any person has violated §

3.2-4207

or any regulation adopted pursuant thereto, the Commissioner may revoke or suspend such person’s privilege to purchase tax stamps at a discounted rate. Each stamp affixed and each offer to sell cigarettes in violation of §

3.2-4207

shall constitute a separate violation. Upon a determination of a violation of § 3.2-4207 or any regulations adopted pursuant thereto, the Commissioner may also impose a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed the greater of (i) 500 percent of the retail value of the cigarettes sold or (ii) $5,000.

Any cigarettes that have been sold, offered for sale or possessed for sale in the Commonwealth, or imported for personal consumption in the Commonwealth, in violation of §

3.2-4207

, shall be deemed contraband and may not be sold or offered for sale unless such cigarettes are listed in the Directory. Any such cigarettes that are sold or offered for sale when not included in the Directory shall be subject to confiscation and forfeiture. Any such confiscation and forfeiture shall be governed by the procedures contained in Chapter 22.1 (§

19.2-386.1

et seq.) of Title 19.2, which shall apply mutatis mutandis; except that all such cigarettes so confiscated and forfeited shall be destroyed and not resold.

The Attorney General may seek an injunction to restrain a threatened or actual violation of §

3.2-4207

, subsection A of §

3.2-4209

, subsection B of §

3.2-4209

, or subsection C of §

3.2-4209

by a stamping agent and to compel the stamping agent to comply with such provisions. In any action brought pursuant to this subsection in which the Commonwealth prevails, the Commonwealth shall be entitled to recover the reasonable costs of investigation, costs of the action and reasonable attorney fees.

It shall be unlawful for a person to (i) sell or distribute cigarettes or (ii) acquire, hold, own, possess, transport, import, or cause to be imported cigarettes that the person knows or should know are intended for distribution or sale in the Commonwealth in violation of §

3.2-4207

. A violation of this section involving less than 3,000 packages of cigarettes is a Class 1 misdemeanor. A violation of this section involving 3,000 or more packages of cigarettes is a Class 1 misdemeanor, and, upon conviction, the sentence of such person shall include a mandatory minimum term of confinement of 90 days.

History.

2003, c. 798, § 3.1-336.10; 2006, c. 674; 2008, cc. 758, 860; 2009, c. 847; 2012, cc. 283, 756.

Cross references.

As to limitations on the Attorney General’s authority to institute and conduct criminal prosecutions involving violations of this section, see §

2.2-511

.

As to definition of “Racketeering activity,” see §

18.2-513

.

As to penalty for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, c. 758, amended former § 3.1-336.10, from which this section is derived.
Pursuant to § 30-152, the 2008 amendment by c. 758 has been given effect in this section as set out above by deleting “on behalf of the Commissioner” following “The Attorney General” at the beginning of subsection C.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 847, in subsection D, substituted “involving less than 3,000 packages of cigarettes is a Class 1 misdemeanor” for “is a Class 2 misdemeanor” in the second sentence and added the third sentence.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by cc. 283 and 756 are identical, and substituted “Chapter 22.1 (§

19.2-386.1

et seq.) of Title 19.2” for “§

4.1-338

” in subsection B and “attorney fees” for “attorneys’ fees” at the end of subsection C.

§ 3.2-4213.
Notice and review of determination.

A determination of the Attorney General to not list or to remove from the Directory a brand family or tobacco product manufacturer shall be subject to review in the manner prescribed by the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.).

History.

2003, c. 798, § 3.1-336.11; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-4214.
Promulgation of regulations.

The Commissioner may promulgate regulations necessary to assist him in performing his duties prescribed by this article.

History.

2003, c. 798, § 3.1-336.12; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-4215.
Submission to jurisdiction of the Commonwealth; pleadings in English sufficient.

Any tobacco product manufacturer that produces cigarettes sold or offered for sale into or within the Commonwealth shall be deemed to have submitted to and agreed to the jurisdiction of the courts of the Commonwealth for the purpose of trying any action brought by the Commonwealth to enforce provisions of this article or Article 1 (§

3.2-4200

et seq.) of this chapter.

In any action brought by the Commonwealth to enforce the provisions of this article or Article 1 (§

3.2-4200

et seq.) of this chapter, sufficient notice of the action to the alleged violator shall be given by a complaint written in the English language. The Commonwealth shall not be required to bear any expense of translating such complaint into another language.

History.

2003, c. 798, § 3.1-336.13; 2008, c. 860.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Personal jurisdiction issue partially determined. —

Two counts in the Commonwealth’s complaint against a tobacco company under the Virginia Tobacco Escrow Statute, §§ 3.1-336.1 and 3.1-336.2, were barred by direct estoppel since the issue of personal jurisdiction as to two of the four years for which escrow payments under the act were sought had already been litigated in favor of the tobacco company. However, since the Commonwealth added two additional years for which it sought the escrow payments for in the new suit filed, those claims were separate and independent causes of action that had not been previously litigated and plaintiffs were entitled to pursue them.
Commonwealth ex rel. Kilgore v. Patriot Tobacco Co., 71 Va. Cir. 415, 2005 Va. Cir. LEXIS 372 (Richmond June 1, 2005) (decided under prior law).

§ 3.2-4215.1.
Authority of Attorney General; audit and investigation.

The Attorney General or his authorized representative shall have the authority to:

Conduct audits and investigations of (i) a nonparticipating manufacturer and its importers or a tobacco product manufacturer as defined in §

3.2-4200

that became a participating manufacturer after the Master Settlement execution date, as defined at section II (aa) of the Master Settlement Agreement, and its importers, (ii) exclusive distributors, retail dealers, stamping agents, and wholesale dealers, as defined in §

58.1-1000

, and (iii) persons or entities engaged in delivery sales as defined in §

18.2-246.6

; and

Upon reasonable cause to believe that a violation of this article or of Article 1 (§

3.2-4200

et seq.) of this chapter, or of Chapter 10 (§

58.1-1000

et seq.) of Title 58.1, or Article 10 (§

18.2-246.6

et seq.) of Chapter 6 of Title 18.2 has occurred or is reasonably likely to occur, issue subpoenas, compel the attendance of witnesses, administer oaths, certify to official acts, take depositions within and without the Commonwealth, as now provided by law, and compel the production of pertinent books, payrolls, accounts, papers, records, documents, and testimony relevant to such investigation. If a person refuses, without good cause, to be examined or to answer a legal and pertinent question, or to produce a document or other evidence when ordered to do so by the Attorney General or his authorized representative, the Attorney General or his authorized representative may apply to the judge of the circuit court of the jurisdiction where such person is in attendance or located, upon affidavit, for an order returnable in no less than two nor more than five days, directing such person to show cause why he should not be examined, answer a legal or pertinent question or produce a document, record or other evidence. Upon the hearing of such, if the court determines that such person, without good cause, has refused to be examined or to answer legal or pertinent questions, or to produce a document, record or other evidence, the court may order compliance with the subpoena and assess all costs and reasonable attorney fees against such person. If the motion for an order is granted and the person thereafter fails to comply with the order, the court may make such orders as are provided for in the Rules of the Supreme Court of Virginia. Subpoenas shall be served and witness fees and mileage paid as allowed in civil cases in the circuit courts of the Commonwealth.

History.

2008, c. 758, § 3.1-336.13:1.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, c. 758 enacted § 3.1-336.13:1. Pursuant to § 30-152, Acts 2008, c. 758 has been given effect in this section as set out above.

§ 3.2-4216.
Recovery of costs and fees by Attorney General.

In any action brought by the Commonwealth to enforce this article or Article 1 (§

3.2-4200

et seq.) of this chapter in which the Commonwealth prevails, or as part of the settlement of any matter arising from an investigation prior to the filing of such action, and in addition to any civil or criminal penalty or other amount which the court may determine, the Attorney General shall be entitled to recover the reasonable costs of investigation, expert witness fees, costs of the action and reasonable attorneys’ fees.

History.

2003, c. 798, § 3.1-336.14; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-4217.
Disgorgement of profits for violations.

If a court determines that a person has violated this article, the court shall order any profits, gain, gross receipts or other benefit from the violation to be disgorged and paid to the Treasurer of the Commonwealth. Unless otherwise expressly provided, the remedies or penalties provided by this article are cumulative to each other and to the remedies or penalties available under all other laws of the Commonwealth.

History.

2003, c. 798, § 3.1-336.15; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-4217.1.
Presumption.

In any action under subsection C of §

3.2-4201

, reports of numbers of cigarettes stamped submitted to the Attorney General pursuant to subsection A of §

3.2-4209

shall be admissible in evidence and shall be presumed to accurately state the number of cigarettes stamped during the time period by the stamping agent that submitted the report absent a contrary showing by the nonparticipating manufacturer or importer. Nothing in this section shall be construed as limiting or otherwise affecting the Commonwealth’s right to maintain that such reports are incorrect or do not accurately reflect a nonparticipating manufacturer’s sales in the Commonwealth during the time period in question, and the presumption shall not apply in the event the Commonwealth does so maintain.

History.

2008, c. 758, § 3.1-336.15:1.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, c. 758 enacted § 3.1-336.15:1. Pursuant to § 30-152, Acts 2008, c. 758 has been given effect in this section as set out above.

§ 3.2-4218.
Conflicts.

If an appropriate court finds that the provisions of this article and of Article 1 (§

3.2-4200

et seq.) of this chapter conflict and cannot be harmonized, then the provisions of Article 1 shall control. If any section, subsection, subdivision, paragraph, sentence, clause or phrase of this article causes Article 1 to no longer constitute a qualifying or model statute, as those terms are defined in the Master Settlement Agreement, then that portion of this article shall not be valid.

History.

2003, c. 798, § 3.1-336.16; 2008, c. 860; 2015, c. 709.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 709 deleted the last sentence pertaining to severability.

§ 3.2-4219.
Materially false statements.

Any tobacco product manufacturer, stamping agent, or importer of cigarettes, or any officer, employee, or agent of any such entity, who knowingly and with the intent to defraud, mislead, or deceive makes any materially false statement in any record required by this chapter to be kept, or in any document required by this chapter to be filed with the Attorney General is guilty of a violation of §

18.2-498.3

. Each document filed containing one or more false statements shall constitute a separate offense.

History.

2009, c. 847.

Cross references.

As to definition of “Racketeering activity,” see §

18.2-513

.